tests/nouns-lik.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] nom":
    уьстинлик<n><nom> : уьстинлик
    уьстинлик<n><pl><nom> : уьстинликлер

  "[twol] dat":
    уьстинлик<n><dat> : уьстинликке

  "[twol] poss": 
    уьстинлик<n><px1pl><nom> : уьстинлигимиз
